Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 5. Wyoming Council for Women's Issues

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2, provides that the members of the Wyoming council for women's issues serving on the council before the effective date of this act (July 1, 2002) are to continue to serve for the remainder of their term on and after that date except that on that date, the chief executive officer of the Wyoming business council is to serve as ex officio member in lieu of the director of the department of employment. Any employee of the council for women's issues is to be transferred to the Wyoming business council.

§ 9-12-501.
Creation; areas of attention. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 150, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-229.1; Laws 1977, ch. 36, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1201; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

9-2-601

; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-603

by 2022 ch. 10, § 1, effective March 8, 2022.

§ 9-12-502.
Membership; term; appointments; vacancies; removal; officers; acceptance of gifts and donations; expenses. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 150, §§ 2, 4; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-229.2, 9-229.4; Laws 1971, ch. 9, § 1; 1977, ch. 36, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-1202, 9-3-1204; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1989, ch. 139, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2000, ch. 40, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-2-602; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-604

by 2022 ch. 10, § 1, effective March 8, 2022.